Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5373XS (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 2023 Section 1. REPEAL. Section 34A.12, Code 2026, is repealed. 1 EXPLANATION 2 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 3 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 4 Under current law, the 911 program manager may request 5 reimbursement from each joint 911 service board for certain 6 reasonable costs related to the delivery of 911 call traffic to 7 public safety answering points. Each joint 911 service board 8 is required to reimburse the department of homeland security 9 and emergency management within 30 days of the request. This 10 bill repeals the authority for the 911 program manager to 11 request reimbursement and the requirement of each joint 911 12 service board to pay such reimbursement. 13 -1- LSB 5373XS (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 1